Hawaii statutes.
[§412:2-111] Commissioner's power to
subpoena. In the course of an investigation of matters affecting the
interest of consumers or depositors or of any other matter within the
jurisdiction of the division, the commissioner may summon persons and subpoena
witnesses, compel their attendance, administer oaths and examine any person
under oath, and require the production of books, papers, documents, or objects
that the commissioner deems relevant or material to the inquiry. Any summons
or subpoena may be served by certified mail with return receipt requested.
Powers granted under this section may be enforced by the circuit court. [L
2001, c 170, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next